Maine, session 132, LD728.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §12602, as amended by PL 2019, c. 224, §1 to 4 and c. 325, §7,
is further amended by enacting before the 2nd indented paragraph a new indented
paragraph to read:
A person may temporarily exceed smelt limits when actively fishing for smelt if the
fish are alive and being held in a grader or other live containment device. When a person
is finished fishing for the day, the person may measure the person's catch and shall
immediately release live smelts that exceed the daily bag limit at the water's edge.